Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-428.02
Rural emergency hospital services, defined.

Rural emergency hospital services means the following services, provided by a rural emergency hospital, that do not require in excess of an annual per-patient average of twenty-four hours in such rural emergency hospital:

(1) Emergency department services and observation care; and

(2) At the election of the rural emergency hospital, for services provided on an outpatient basis, other medical and health services as specified in regulations adopted by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services and authorized by the Nebraska Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 2022, LB697, § 4.